el: Χαρακτηριστικά ασφαλείας της πρόσοψης: Αποσπώμενη με ενδεικτικό LED συναγερμού; Αποσπώμενη με θήκη μεταφοράς; Μηχανοκίνητη / αναδιπλούμενη πρόσοψη; Κανένα; Κωδικός ασφαλείας / αντικλεπτική κλειδαριά; Άλλο
zh-CN: 面板安全功能: 可拆卸并带报警指示灯 (LED); 可拆卸并配有便携包; 电动 / 下翻式面板; 无; 安全代码 / 防盗锁; 其他
ja: フェイスプレートセキュリティ機能: アラームインジケーターLED付き取り外し可能タイプ; キャリングケース付き取り外し可能タイプ; 電動 / フリップダウンパネル; なし; セキュリティコード / 盗難防止ロック; その他
tr: Ön panel güvenlik özellikleri: Alarm göstergesi LED'li ayrılabilir; Taşıma çantalı ayrılabilir; Motorlu / açılır kapanır panel; Yok; Güvenlik kodu / hırsızlık önleme kilidi; Diğer
en: Faceplate security features: Detachable with alarm indicator LED; Detachable with carry case; Motorized / flip-down panel; None; Security code / anti-theft lock; Other
hr-HR: Sigurnosne značajke prednje ploče: Odvojivo uz LED indikator alarma; Odvojivo uz torbicu za nošenje; Motorizirana / preklopna ploča; Nema; Sigurnosni kod / brava protiv krađe; Ostalo
pt-BR: Recursos de segurança do painel frontal: Removível com LED indicador de alarme; Removível com estojo de transporte; Painel motorizado/rebatível; Nenhum; Código de segurança/trava antifurto; Outros
hu: Előlap biztonsági jellemzői: Levehető, riasztó LED-del; Levehető, hordtáskával; Motoros / lehajtható panel; Nincs; Biztonsági kód / lopásgátló zár; Egyéb
ru: Защитные функции лицевой панели: Съемная панель с LED-индикатором сигнализации; Съемная панель с футляром; Моторизованная/откидная панель; Нет; Код безопасности / противоугонный замок; Другое
ro-RO: Caracteristici de securitate ale panoului frontal: Detașabil, cu LED indicator de alarmă; Detașabil, cu husă de transport; Motorizat / panou rabatabil; Fără; Cod de securitate / blocaj antifurt; Altele
da: Frontpladens sikkerhedsfunktioner: Aftagelig med alarmindikator-LED; Aftagelig med bæreæske; Motoriseret/nedvipningspanel; Ingen; Sikkerhedskode / tyverisikringslås; Andet
es: Funciones de seguridad de la placa frontal: Extraíble con LED indicador de alarma; Extraíble con estuche de transporte; Motorizado/panel abatible; Ninguno; Código de seguridad/cierre antirrobo; Otro
bg-BG: Функции за сигурност на лицевия панел: Свалящ се панел с LED индикатор за аларма; Свалящ се панел с калъф за носене; Моторизиран / падащ панел; Няма; Код за сигурност / ключалка против кражба; Друго
vi: Các tính năng bảo mật của mặt ốp: Có thể tháo rời tích hợp đèn LED báo động; Có thể tháo rời kèm hộp đựng; Động cơ / bảng gập xuống; Không có; Mã bảo mật/khóa chống trộm; Khác
cs: Bezpečnostní prvky čelního panelu: Odnímatelný s LED indikátorem alarmu; Odnímatelný s přenosným pouzdrem; Motorizovaný / sklopný panel; Žádné; Bezpečnostní kód / zámek proti krádeži; Jiné
pl: Funkcje zabezpieczające panelu przedniego: Zdejmowany z diodą LED alarmu; Zdejmowany z etui transportowym; Panel z napędem / odchylany; Brak; Kod zabezpieczający / blokada antykradzieżowa; Inne
nb: Sikkerhetsfunksjoner i ansiktsplate: Avtakbar med alarmindikator (LED); Avtakbar med bæreveske; Motorisert / nedfellbart panel; Ingen; Sikkerhetskode / tyverisikring; Annet
nl: Beveiligingsfuncties frontpaneel: Afneembaar met alarm-led; Afneembaar met draagtas; Gemotoriseerd / uitklapbaar paneel; Geen; Beveiligingscode / antidiefstalslot; Overig
th: คุณสมบัติการรักษาความปลอดภัยของแผงหน้าปัด: ถอดได้พร้อมไฟ LED ระบุสัญญาณเตือน; ถอดได้พร้อมกระเป๋าพกพา; ใช้มอเตอร์ / แผงพับลง; ไม่มี; รหัสความปลอดภัย / ล็อกกันขโมย; อื่นๆ
sv: Saknar säkerhetsfunktioner: Avtagbar med larmindikator (LED); Avtagbar med bärväska; Motoriserad / nedfällbar panel; Ingen; Säkerhetskod / stöldskyddslås; Övrigt
ko: 페이스플레이트 보안 기능: 알람 표시 LED 포함 탈착식; 휴대용 케이스 포함 탈착식; 모터 작동 / 플립다운 패널; 없음; 보안 코드 / 도난 방지 잠금장치; 기타
it: Caratteristiche di sicurezza del frontale: Rimovibile con indicatore LED di allarme; Rimovibile con custodia per il trasporto; Pannello motorizzato/a ribalta; Nessuno; Codice di sicurezza/blocco antifurto; Altro
fi: Etupaneelin turvaominaisuudet: Irrotettava, LED-hälytysvalo; Irrotettava, sis. kantokotelon; Moottoroitu / kääntyvä paneeli; Ei mitään; Turvakoodi / varkaudenestolukko; Muu
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné prvky čelného panelu: Odnímateľný s LED indikátorom alarmu; Odnímateľný s puzdrom na prenášanie; Motorizovaný/výklopný panel; Žiadne; Bezpečnostný kód/zámok proti krádeži; Iné
de: Frontplatten-Sicherheitsmerkmale: Abnehmbar mit Alarm-LED; Abnehmbar mit Tragetasche; Motorisiert / ausklappbares Panel; Keine; Sicherheitscode / Diebstahlsicherung; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Varnostni elementi čelne plošče: Snemljivo z LED-indikatorjem alarma; Snemljivo s prenosno torbico; Motorizirana/zložljiva plošča; Brez; Varnostna koda / ključavnica proti kraji; Drugo
pt-PT: Características de segurança da placa frontal: Amovível com LED indicador de alarme; Amovível com estojo de transporte; Painel motorizado/rebatível; Nenhum; Código de segurança/fecho antirroubo; Outro
lt-LT: Priekinio skydelio saugos ypatybės: Nuimamas su pavojaus LED indikatoriumi; Nuimamas su nešiojimo dėklu; Motorizuotas / atlenkiamas skydelis; Nėra; Apsaugos kodas / apsaugos nuo vagystės užraktas; Kita
fr: Caractéristiques de sécurité de la façade: Détachable avec voyant d’alarme; Détachable avec étui de transport; Panneau motorisé/rabattable; Aucun; Code de sécurité/antivol; Autre
zh-TW: 面板安全功能: 可拆卸附警示 LED 燈; 可拆卸附收納盒; 電動 / 下翻式面板; 無; 安全碼 / 防盜鎖; 其他